.history/liheci_20251208024044.lexc
LEXICON SplitEndSep
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;
    ^SEP:^SEP SplitEnd ;

LEXICON SplitEnd
LEXICON End
    +V/O:0 # ;

LEXICON WholePath
    睡觉:睡觉 +V/O End ;
    洗澡:洗澡 +V/O End ;
    吃饭:吃饭 +V/O End ;
    刷牙:刷牙 +V/O End ;
    洗脸:洗脸 +V/O End ;
    走路:走路 +V/O End ;
    跑步:跑步 +V/O End ;
    散步:散步 +V/O End ;
    上网:上网 +V/O End ;
    理发:理发 +V/O End ;
    搬家:搬家 +V/O End ;
    起床:起床 +V/O End ;
    看书:看书 +V/O End ;
    写字:写字 +V/O End ;
    开门:开门 +V/O End ;
    关灯:关灯 +V/O End ;
    做饭:做饭 +V/O End ;
    打球:打球 +V/O End ;
    抽烟:抽烟 +V/O End ;
    见面:见面 +V/O End ;
    帮忙:帮忙 +V/O End ;
    聊天:聊天 +V/O End ;
    说话:说话 +V/O End ;
    吵架:吵架 +V/O End ;
    打架:打架 +V/O End ;
    打仗:打仗 +V/O End ;
    生气:生气 +V/O End ;
    发火:发火 +V/O End ;
    道歉:道歉 +V/O End ;
    道谢:道谢 +V/O End ;
    拜年:拜年 +V/O End ;
    握手:握手 +V/O End ;
    鼓掌:鼓掌 +V/O End ;
    捣乱:捣乱 +V/O End ;
    开玩笑:开玩笑 +V/O End ;
    谈恋爱:谈恋爱 +V/O End ;
    撒谎:撒谎 +V/O End ;
    吹牛:吹牛 +V/O End ;
    告状:告状 +V/O End ;
    请客:请客 +V/O End ;
    结婚:结婚 +V/O End ;
    离婚:离婚 +V/O End ;
    订婚:订婚 +V/O End ;
    分手:分手 +V/O End ;
    吃醋:吃醋 +V/O End ;
    伤心:伤心 +V/O End ;
    放心:放心 +V/O End ;
    担心:担心 +V/O End ;
    灰心:灰心 +V/O End ;
    操心:操心 +V/O End ;
    动心:动心 +V/O End ;
    上班:上班 +V/O End ;
    下班:下班 +V/O End ;
    上学:上学 +V/O End ;
    上课:上课 +V/O End ;
    下课:下课 +V/O End ;
    请假:请假 +V/O End ;
    放假:放假 +V/O End ;
    考试:考试 +V/O End ;
    毕业:毕业 +V/O End ;
    留学:留学 +V/O End ;
    报名:报名 +V/O End ;
    辞职:辞职 +V/O End ;
    开会:开会 +V/O End ;
    发言:发言 +V/O End ;
    值班:值班 +V/O End ;
    加班:加班 +V/O End ;
    出差:出差 +V/O End ;
    生病:生病 +V/O End ;
    看病:看病 +V/O End ;
    住院:住院 +V/O End ;
    出院:出院 +V/O End ;
    打针:打针 +V/O End ;
    输液:输液 +V/O End ;
    挂号:挂号 +V/O End ;
    把脉:把脉 +V/O End ;
    减肥:减肥 +V/O End ;
    鞠躬:鞠躬 +V/O End ;
    敬礼:敬礼 +V/O End ;
    站岗:站岗 +V/O End ;
    吃苦:吃苦 +V/O End ;
    吃亏:吃亏 +V/O End ;
    受罪:受罪 +V/O End ;
    跳舞:跳舞 +V/O End ;
    唱歌:唱歌 +V/O End ;
    游泳:游泳 +V/O End ;
    划船:划船 +V/O End ;
    钓鱼:钓鱼 +V/O End ;
    滑冰:滑冰 +V/O End ;
    签名:签名 +V/O End ;
    排队:排队 +V/O End ;
    打工:打工 +V/O End ;
    戒烟:戒烟 +V/O End ;
    回家:回家 +V/O End ;
    死心:死心 +V/O End ;
    挑水:挑水 +V/O End ;
    受伤:受伤 +V/O End ;
    散心:散心 +V/O End ;
    扫兴:扫兴 +V/O End ;
    领情:领情 +V/O End ;
    送礼:送礼 +V/O End ;
    拌嘴:拌嘴 +V/O End ;
    叹气:叹气 +V/O End ;
    丢脸:丢脸 +V/O End ;
    接吻:接吻 +V/O End ;
    受骗:受骗 +V/O End ;
    挨批:挨批 +V/O End ;
    干杯:干杯 +V/O End ;
    革命:革命 +V/O End ;
    造反:造反 +V/O End ;
    退休:退休 +V/O End ;
    出事:出事 +V/O End ;
    把关:把关 +V/O End ;
    施肥:施肥 +V/O End ;
    倒霉:倒霉 +V/O End ;
    提醒:提醒 +V/O End ;
    出恭:出恭 +V/O End ;
    将军:将军 +V/O End ;
    学习:学习 +V/O End ;
    小便:小便 +V/O End ;
    大便:大便 +V/O End ;
    军训:军训 +V/O End ;
    体检:体检 +V/O End ;
    同学:同学 +V/O End ;
    暂停:暂停 +V/O End ;
    慷慨:慷慨 +V/O End ;
    幽默:幽默 +V/O End ;
    滑稽:滑稽 +V/O End ;
LEXICON SplitEnd
    觉:觉 +T_NN End ;
    澡:澡 +T_NN End ;
    饭:饭 +T_NN End ;
    牙:牙 +T_NN End ;
    脸:脸 +T_NN End ;
    路:路 +T_NN End ;
    步:步 +T_NN End ;
    步:步 +T_NN End ;
    网:网 +T_NN End ;
    发:发 +T_NN End ;
    家:家 +T_NN End ;
    床:床 +T_NN End ;
    书:书 +T_NN End ;
    字:字 +T_NN End ;
    门:门 +T_NN End ;
    灯:灯 +T_NN End ;
    饭:饭 +T_NN End ;
    球:球 +T_NN End ;
    烟:烟 +T_NN End ;
    面:面 +T_NN End ;
    忙:忙 +T_NN End ;
    天:天 +T_NN End ;
    话:话 +T_NN End ;
    架:架 +T_NN End ;
    架:架 +T_NN End ;
    仗:仗 +T_NN End ;
    气:气 +T_NN End ;
    火:火 +T_NN End ;
    歉:歉 +T_NN End ;
    谢:谢 +T_NN End ;
    年:年 +T_NN End ;
    手:手 +T_NN End ;
    掌:掌 +T_NN End ;
    乱:乱 +T_NN End ;
    玩笑:玩笑 +T_NN End ;
    恋爱:恋爱 +T_NN End ;
    谎:谎 +T_NN End ;
    牛:牛 +T_NN End ;
    状:状 +T_NN End ;
    客:客 +T_NN End ;
    婚:婚 +T_NN End ;
    婚:婚 +T_NN End ;
    婚:婚 +T_NN End ;
    手:手 +T_NN End ;
    醋:醋 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    班:班 +T_NN End ;
    班:班 +T_NN End ;
    学:学 +T_NN End ;
    课:课 +T_NN End ;
    课:课 +T_NN End ;
    假:假 +T_NN End ;
    假:假 +T_NN End ;
    试:试 +T_NN End ;
    业:业 +T_NN End ;
    学:学 +T_NN End ;
    名:名 +T_NN End ;
    职:职 +T_NN End ;
    会:会 +T_NN End ;
    言:言 +T_NN End ;
    班:班 +T_NN End ;
    班:班 +T_NN End ;
    差:差 +T_NN End ;
    病:病 +T_NN End ;
    病:病 +T_NN End ;
    院:院 +T_NN End ;
    院:院 +T_NN End ;
    针:针 +T_NN End ;
    液:液 +T_NN End ;
    号:号 +T_NN End ;
    脉:脉 +T_NN End ;
    肥:肥 +T_NN End ;
    躬:躬 +T_NN End ;
    礼:礼 +T_NN End ;
    岗:岗 +T_NN End ;
    苦:苦 +T_NN End ;
    亏:亏 +T_NN End ;
    罪:罪 +T_NN End ;
    舞:舞 +T_NN End ;
    歌:歌 +T_NN End ;
    泳:泳 +T_NN End ;
    船:船 +T_NN End ;
    鱼:鱼 +T_NN End ;
    冰:冰 +T_NN End ;
    名:名 +T_NN End ;
    队:队 +T_NN End ;
    工:工 +T_NN End ;
    烟:烟 +T_NN End ;
    家:家 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    水:水 +T_NN End ;
    伤:伤 +T_NN End ;
    心:心 +T_NN End ;
    兴:兴 +T_NN End ;
    情:情 +T_NN End ;
    礼:礼 +T_NN End ;
    嘴:嘴 +T_NN End ;
    气:气 +T_NN End ;
    脸:脸 +T_NN End ;
    吻:吻 +T_NN End ;
    骗:骗 +T_NN End ;
    批:批 +T_NN End ;
    杯:杯 +T_NN End ;
    命:命 +T_NN End ;
    反:反 +T_NN End ;
    休:休 +T_NN End ;
    事:事 +T_NN End ;
    关:关 +T_NN End ;
    肥:肥 +T_NN End ;
    霉:霉 +T_NN End ;
    醒:醒 +T_NN End ;
    恭:恭 +T_NN End ;
    军:军 +T_NN End ;
    习:习 +T_NN End ;
    便:便 +T_NN End ;
    便:便 +T_NN End ;
    训:训 +T_NN End ;
    检:检 +T_NN End ;
    学:学 +T_NN End ;
    停:停 +T_NN End ;
    慨:慨 +T_NN End ;
    默:默 +T_NN End ;
    稽:稽 +T_NN End ;
